California statutes. Business and Professions Code
It is unlawful to make any representation that a wine is produced entirely from grapes grown in the counties mentioned in Section 25236 unless the representation is true. This section applies to representations made on labels, advertising matter, letterheads, invoices, tags, signs, business cards, and all other representations of any kind whether oral, written, or printed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25238.

Every winegrower or bottler of wine of any kind within the counties specified in Section 25236 shall keep a record of all wine not produced by him or her and obtained and used by him or her for any purpose. The record shall show the date the wine is obtained, the amount thereof, the source from which obtained, the kind or type of wine, and, in detail, the purpose or purposes for which it is used. Each winegrower or bottler of wine shall keep a complete record showing the total amount of wine produced by him or her, or bottled by him or her, made entirely from grapes grown within the counties mentioned in Section 25236.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 276, Sec. 2.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

25239.

Every person who, with intent to defraud, either falsely makes, alters, forges, or counterfeits the label for any wine or uses the label or bottle of any wine belonging to another, without his or her consent, is guilty of a misdemeanor. The department may seize wine labeled in violation of this section, regardless of where found and may dispose of the wine pursuant to Section 25355.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 135, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

25240.

(a) Any wine labeled with a viticultural area appellation of origin established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 9.1) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, other than the viticultural area “Napa Valley,” and which is located entirely within a county of the 29th class, shall bear the designation “Napa Valley” on the label in direct conjunction therewith in a type size not smaller than 1mm less than that of the viticultural area designation provided neither designation is smaller than 2mm on containers of more than 187ml or smaller than 1mm on containers of 187ml or less. This requirement shall apply to all wines bottled on or after January 1, 1990.

(b) The department may suspend or revoke the license of any person who violates this section.

(c) This section shall not apply to any wine labeled with a viticultural area appellation of origin established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 9.1) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations when the name of the appellation includes the term “Napa Valley.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 674, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

25241.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that for more than a century, Napa Valley and Napa County have been widely recognized for producing grapes and wine of the highest quality. Both consumers and the wine industry understand the name Napa County and the viticultural area appellations of origin contained within Napa County (collectively “Napa appellations”) as denoting that the wine was created with the distinctive grapes grown in Napa County.

(2) The Legislature finds, however, that certain producers are using Napa appellations on labels, on packaging materials, and in advertising for wines that are not made from grapes grown in Napa County, and that consumers are confused and deceived by these practices.

(3) The Legislature further finds that legislation is necessary to eliminate these misleading practices. It is the intent of the Legislature to assure consumers that the wines produced or sold in the state with brand names, packaging materials, or advertising referring to Napa appellations in fact qualify for the Napa County appellation of origin.

(b) No wine produced, bottled, labeled, offered for sale or sold in California shall use, in a brand name or otherwise, on any label, packaging material, or advertising, any of the names of viticultural significance listed in subdivision (c), unless that wine qualifies under Section 4.25a of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations for the appellation of origin Napa County and includes on the label, packaging material, and advertising that appellation or a viticultural area appellation of origin that is located entirely within Napa County, subject to compliance with Section 25240.

Notwithstanding the above, this subdivision shall not grant any labeling, packaging, or advertising rights that are prohibited under federal law or regulations.

(c) The following are names of viticultural significance for purposes of this section:

(1) Napa.

(2) Any viticultural area appellation of origin established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 9.1) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations that is located entirely within Napa County.

(3) Any similar name to those in paragraph (1) or (2) that is likely to cause confusion as to the origin of the wine.

(d) The appellation of origin required by this section shall meet the legibility and size-of-type requirements set forth in either Section 4.38 or Section 4.63 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, whichever is applicable.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), any name of viticultural significance may appear either as part of the address required by Sections 4.35 and 4.62 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if it is also the post office address of the bottling or producing winery or of the permittee responsible for the advertising, or as part of any factual, nonmisleading statement as to the history or location of the winery.

(f) The department may suspend or revoke the license of any person who produces or bottles wine who violates this section. Following notice of violation to the person in possession of the wine and a hearing to be held within 15 days thereafter, if requested by any interested party within five days following the notice, the department may seize wine labeled or packaged in violation of this section regardless of where found, and may dispose of the wine upon order of the department. From the time of notice until the departmental determination, the wine shall not be sold or transferred.

(g) This section applies only to wine which is produced, bottled, or labeled after January 1, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 831, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25242.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that for more than a century, certain California counties have been widely recognized for producing grapes and wine of the highest quality. Both consumers and the wine industry associate the names of those counties with the distinctive wine produced from grapes grown within those counties. If producers were to use the names of these counties on labels, for packaging materials, and in advertising for wines that are not made from grapes grown in the designated counties, consumers may be confused or deceived by these practices.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to assure consumers that the wines produced or sold in the state with brand names, packaging materials, or advertising that mention or refer to these California counties, in fact accurately reflect the origin of the grapes used to make the referenced wine.

(b) (1) No wine produced, bottled, labeled, offered for sale or sold in California shall use, in a brand name or otherwise, on any label, packaging material, or advertising, the name of viticultural significance listed in subdivision (c), unless that wine qualifies under Section 4.25 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations for an appellation of origin that is either Sonoma County or a viticultural area lying entirely within Sonoma County and includes that appellation of origin on the label, packaging material, and advertising for the wine.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), this subdivision shall not grant any labeling, packaging, or advertising rights that are prohibited under federal law or regulations.

(c) The following name is of viticultural significance for purposes of this section:

(1) Sonoma.

(2) Any similar name to that in paragraph (1) that is likely to cause confusion as to the origin of the wine.

(d) The appellation of origin required by this section shall meet the legibility and size-of-type requirements set forth in either Section 4.38 or Section 4.63 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, whichever is applicable.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), any name of viticultural significance may appear either as part of the address required by Sections 4.35 and 4.62 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if it is also the post office address of the bottling or producing winery or of the permittee responsible for the advertising, or as part of any factual, nonmisleading statement as to the history or location of the winery.

(f) The department may suspend or revoke the license of any person who produces or bottles wine who violates this section. Following notice of violation to the person in possession of the wine and a hearing to be held within 15 days thereafter, if requested by any interested party within five days following the notice, the department may seize wine labeled or packaged in violation of this section regardless of where found, and may dispose of the wine upon order of the department. From the time of notice until the departmental determination, the wine shall not be sold or transferred.

(g) This section applies only to wine which is produced, bottled, or labeled after December 31, 2008.

(h) This section does not pertain to the use of a brand name, or otherwise, which was the name of the winery owner as established prior to 1950.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 879, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25243.

No provision of this article shall preclude a wine from using, on any label, packaging material, or advertising, either (a) a truthful, nonmisleading appellation of origin that complies with Section 4.25(c) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations governing multicounty appellations, or (b) a truthful, nonmisleading statement as to the geographic location of the wine’s stated appellation or appellations of origin which is located in not more than two counties, for which the wine qualifies under applicable federal law, or both the appellation of origin and the statement of geographic location; provided that the label, packaging material, or advertising contains no other use of a name of viticultural significance, in a brand name or otherwise, that is prohibited by Section 25241 or 25242.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25244.

(a) Any wine labeled with a viticultural area appellation of origin established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 9.1) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations that is located entirely within the “Paso Robles” viticultural area shall bear the designation “Paso Robles” on the label in direct conjunction therewith in a type size not smaller than 1mm less than that of said viticultural area designation, provided neither designation is smaller than 2mm on containers of more than 187ml or smaller than 1mm on containers of 187ml or less.

(b) The department may suspend or revoke the license of any person who violates this section.

(c) This section shall not apply to any wine labeled with a viticultural area appellation of origin established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 9.1) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations when the name of the appellation includes the term “Paso Robles.”

(d) This section applies only to wine that is bottled on or after January 1, 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 674, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

25245.

(a) Any wine labeled with a viticultural area appellation of origin established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 9.1) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations that is located entirely within the “Lodi” viticultural area shall bear the designation “Lodi” on the label in direct conjunction therewith in a type size not smaller than 1mm less than that of said viticultural area designation, provided neither designation is smaller than 2mm on containers of more than 187ml or smaller than 1mm on containers of 187ml or less.

(b) The department may suspend or revoke the license of any person who violates this section.

(c) This section shall not apply to any wine labeled with a viticultural area appellation of origin established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 9.1) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations when the name of the appellation includes the term “Lodi.”

(d) This section applies only to wine that is bottled on or after January 1, 2009.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25246.

(a) Any wine labeled with an American Viticultural Area established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 9.1) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that is located entirely within a county of the 19th class, shall bear the designation “Sonoma County” on the label in a type size not smaller than two millimeters on containers of more than 187 milliliters or smaller than one millimeter on containers of 187 milliliters or less.

(b) The department may suspend or revoke the license of any person who violates this section.

(c) This section shall not apply to any wine labeled with a viticultural area appellation of origin
 established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 9.1) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations when the name of the appellation includes the term “Sonoma County.”

(d) This section shall apply to wines bottled on or after January 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   (AB 1798)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

25247.

(a) Any wine labeled with an American Viticultural Area established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 9.1) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations that is located entirely within the County of Monterey shall bear the designation “Monterey County” on the label in a type size not smaller than two millimeters on containers of more than 187 milliliters or smaller than one millimeter on containers of 187 milliliters or less.

(b) The department may suspend or revoke the license of any person who violates this section.

(c) This section shall not apply to any wine labeled with a viticultural area appellation of origin established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section
 9.1) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations when the name of the appellation is “Monterey.”

(d) This section shall apply to wines bottled on or after January 1, 2019. 

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a violation of this section shall not subject a person to any civil or criminal penalties pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   (AB 394)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25248.

(a) Any wine labeled with an American Viticultural Area established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 9.1) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations that is located entirely within the County of Mendocino shall bear the designation “Mendocino County” on the label in a type size not smaller than two millimeters on containers of more than 187 milliliters or not smaller than one millimeter on containers of 187 milliliters or less.

(b) The department may suspend or revoke the license of any person who violates this section.

(c) This section shall not apply to any wine labeled with a viticultural area appellation of origin established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing
 with Section 9.1) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations when the name of the appellation includes “Mendocino.”

(d) This section shall apply to wines bottled on or after January 1, 2023.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a violation of this section shall not subject a person to any civil or criminal penalties pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 362, Sec. 2.   (SB 918)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Seizure and Forfeiture of Property [25350. - 25375.]

25350.

The department may seize the following alcoholic beverages:

(a) Alcoholic beverages manufactured or produced in this state by any person other than licensed manufacturer or wine grower, regardless of where found.

(b) Beer and wine upon the sale of which the excise tax imposed by Part 14 (commencing
 with Section 32001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code has not been paid, regardless of where found.

(c) Distilled spirits except (1) distilled spirits located upon premises for which licenses authorizing the sale of the distilled spirits have been issued; (2) distilled spirits consigned to and in the course of transportation to a licensee holding licenses authorizing the sale of the distilled spirits or for delivery without this state; (3) distilled spirits upon the sale of which the excise tax imposed by Part 14 (commencing with Section 32001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code has been paid; (4) alcohol or distilled spirits in the possession of a person who has lawfully purchased it for use in the trades, professions, or industries and not for beverage use.

(d) Any
 alcoholic beverage possessed, kept, stored, or owned with the intent to sell it without a license in violation of this division.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any alcoholic beverage acquired, exchanged, purchased, sold, delivered, or possessed in violation of Sections 23104.2, 23104.3, 23394, 23402, or Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 25000), except that seizures under this subdivision shall be limited to the actual package or case of alcoholic beverage acquired, exchanged, purchased, sold, delivered, or possessed in violation of the foregoing provisions. Any seizure under this subdivision shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) of alcoholic beverages at retail price.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 22.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25351.

Any person who possesses alcoholic beverages which are subject to seizure under Section 25350 is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25352.

The department or its employees may seize any unlicensed still, whether in actual operation or not and whether assembled for operation or dismantled, any parts of such stills, and any materials or supplies capable of being used for the manufacture of alcoholic beverages which are found on or about the premises where any unlicensed still or parts thereof are found. The department or its employees may also seize any implements, instruments, vehicles, and personal property in the place or building, or within any yard or enclosure, where any unlicensed still or parts thereof are found.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25353.

When alcoholic beverages or any other property are seized pursuant to this division, the alcoholic beverages or other property shall be forfeited to the State, and all such forfeitures are hereby declared to be statutory forfeitures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25354.

Alcoholic beverages manufactured or produced in this state by any person other than a licensed manufacturer or winegrower, when seized for forfeiture under this division, may be disposed of by the department, its officers, or employees by summary destruction. Controlled substances, instruments, or paraphernalia seized by the department may only be disposed of pursuant to a court order for destruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 787, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

25355.

Any alcoholic beverages or other property seized for forfeiture under this division, except automobiles or other vehicles, may be disposed of by the department, its officers, or employees by destruction or otherwise as provided in this division, upon order of the department made not less than 15 days after the date of seizure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25356.

Any person whose alcoholic beverages or other property, except automobiles or other vehicles, have been seized for forfeiture under this division, may, within 10 days after such seizure, petition the department to return the alcoholic beverages or other property upon the grounds that the alcoholic beverages or other property were illegally or erroneously seized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25357.

Any petition filed pursuant to Section 25356 shall be considered by the department within 60 days after filing, and an oral hearing shall be granted the petitioner if requested. The department shall serve notice of its decision upon the petitioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25358.

The department may order the alcoholic beverages or other property seized disposed of, or returned to the petitioner if illegally or erroneously seized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25359.

Any beverage or other property seized by the department may be turned over to any state department or institution. The person in charge of any state department or institution may file with the department a request that beverages or other property of a kind specified in the request be turned over to the department or institution. No beverage or property for which a request has been made by a state department or institution shall be destroyed until all requests of state departments and institutions for the type or kind of beverage or property have been complied with.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25360.

When alcoholic beverages or other property are seized or forfeited under this division and are not disposed of pursuant to Sections 25354 to 25359, inclusive, the alcoholic beverages or other property shall be subjected to a forfeiture proceeding in the superior court as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25361.

Notice of the seizure and of the intended forfeiture proceeding shall be filed with the clerk of the court and shall be served on all persons, firms, or corporations having any right, title, or interest in the alcoholic beverages or other property seized. If the owner or owners are unknown or cannot be found, notice of the seizure and intended forfeiture proceedings shall be made upon such owners by publication pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in the county where the seizure was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25362.

Within 20 days after service of the notice of seizure and intended forfeiture proceedings, or within 20 days after the date of publication, the owner or owners of the alcoholic beverages or other property seized may file a verified answer to the fact of the alleged unlawful use of the alcoholic beverages or other property. The claimant of any right, title, or interest in the alcoholic beverages or other property seized may make a verified answer to establish his claim as provided in Section 25367. No extensions of time shall be granted for the purpose of making the verified answer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25363.

If at the end of 20 days after the notice has been mailed or published there is no verified answer on file, the court shall hear evidence upon the fact of unlawful use and shall, upon proof thereof, order the alcoholic beverages or other property forfeited to the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25364.

If a verified answer has been filed, the forfeiture proceeding may be set for hearing on a day within 30 days from the date of filing, and notice of this proceeding shall be given to the owner or owners filing verified answers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25365.

At the time set for the hearing, any of the owners who have verified answers on file may show by competent evidence that the alcoholic beverages or other property were not in fact used contrary to the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25366.

If the fact is determined that the alcoholic beverages or other property were not used contrary to the provisions of this division, the court shall order the alcoholic beverages or other property released to the owner or owners thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25367.

At the time set for the hearing the claimant of any right, title, or interest in the alcoholic beverages or other property under a lien, mortgage, or conditional sales contract which is officially of record may prove that the lien, mortgage, or conditional sales contract is bona fide and was created after a reasonable investigation of the moral responsibility, character, and reputation of the lienor, mortgagor, or vendee and without any knowledge that the alcoholic beverages or other property was being, or was to be, used contrary to the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25368.

If the lienholder, mortgagee, or vendor proves the facts set forth in Section 25367, the court shall order the alcoholic beverages or other property released to him if the amount due to him is equal to, or in excess of, the value of the alcoholic beverages or other property. If the amount due to him is less than the value of the alcoholic beverages or other property, the alcoholic beverages or other property shall be sold at public auction by the department, and the remainder of the proceeds of the sale, after payment of the balance due on the purchase price, mortgage, or lien, shall be deposited in the State Treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25369.

In any case the Department of Finance may, within 30 days after judgment, pay the balance due to the bona fide or innocent purchaser, lienholder, mortgagee, or vendor and purchase the alcoholic beverages or other property for the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25370.

Upon a judgment in favor of the forfeiture, the alcoholic beverages or other property shall be ordered turned over to the Department of General Services for disposition as follows:

(a) Delivery to the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control for use in the needs of the department as may be requested by it.

(b) Delivery to any other state department, board, commission, officer, hospital, or institution.

(c) Sale at public auction, and when alcoholic beverages are sold at public auction
 they shall be sold only to licensees authorized to sell them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

25371.

When alcoholic beverages or other property are seized under this division, a record of the seizure and disposition shall be kept by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25372.

Any officer, employee, or agent of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control who disposes of any alcoholic beverages or other property seized under this division in any manner other than as directed by order of the court or the provisions of this division is liable to the State in a civil action and is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

25373.

Any peace officer of this State upon seizing any alcoholic beverages or other property may hold them as evidence until a forfeiture has been declared, a release ordered as provided in this chapter, or other disposition has been made pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25374.

Nothing contained in this chapter applies to common carriers or to an employee acting within the scope of his employment under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

25375.

(a) Upon 10 days notice to a person who holds a license described in this division, the Attorney General or a district attorney shall seek an order from the superior court for the seizure of a license described in this division for purposes of seeking forfeiture of the license pursuant to Sections 11470 to 11492, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code. From the time of notice until the hearing to establish probable cause, as provided by this section, the license may not be sold or transferred. The 10-day period may be extended by the court for good cause or upon the stipulation of the parties.

(b) A petition for forfeiture pursuant to Section 11488.4 of the Health and Safety Code shall be filed within 10 days of the service of notice pursuant to this section.

(c) At the hearing, the Attorney General or district attorney shall establish probable cause that the license is subject to forfeiture pursuant to Section 11470 of the Health and Safety Code. The showing of probable cause may be established by deposition, affidavit, declaration, prior judicial testimony, or other evidence. The licensee may produce evidence to refute the showing of probable cause.

(d) If the court determines there is probable cause that the license is subject to forfeiture, it shall issue an order for its seizure by any peace officer within its jurisdiction.

(e) If probable
 cause is not established at the hearing, or if the hearing is neither held within the 10-day period nor continued for good cause or by stipulation of the parties, the prohibition against the sale or transfer of the license shall immediately cease and the petition for forfeiture shall be dismissed.

(f) Immediately upon seizure of the license, the peace officer shall surrender the license to the department by certified mail, along with written notice to the department of the seizure and intention to seek the initiation of forfeiture proceedings. No person who holds any interest in a license shall exercise any privileges of that license after it has been seized and during the time it is surrendered to the department pursuant to this subdivision.

However, if the licensee appears and in any manner contest the showing of probable cause required by this subdivision, the licensee shall be barred from bringing
 a motion pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 11488.4 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) Notwithstanding Article 5 (commencing with Section 23090) of Chapter 1.5 of this division, the Attorney General or a district attorney may seek a pendente lite order as provided in Section 11492 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 186.6 of the Penal Code relating to the custody, right, title, interest, and exercise of rights and privileges as related to a license described in this division which is the subject of a forfeiture proceeding pursuant to Section 11488.4 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 186.4 of the Penal Code.

(h) Rights and privileges related to any license which is the subject of a forfeiture proceeding and which has been seized and surrendered to the department pursuant to this section may be exercised solely by a receiver appointed pursuant to
 Section 11492 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 186.6 of the Penal Code. No license, rights, or privileges of a license may be exercised by a receiver until that person has been found qualified to hold a license in his or her own right by the department pursuant to this division and the license has been issued to the custody of the receiver. Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 23950) of this division does not apply to a receiver appointed pursuant to this paragraph. Any receiver appointed pursuant to Section 11492 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 186.6 of the Penal Code who exercises privileges of a license issued to his or her custody shall be subject to disciplinary proceedings and may have the license suspended or revoked in the same manner as if he or she were licensed directly pursuant to this division.

(i) Upon the entry of a judgment of forfeiture pursuant to Section 11488.5 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 186.6 of
 the Penal Code, or a declaration of forfeiture pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 11488.5 of the Health and Safety Code forfeiting a license described in this division, the state or local government entity shall sell and transfer the license in accordance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 23950) of this division. The proceeds of that sale and transfer shall be allocated as specified in Section 11489 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 186.8 of the Penal Code, as appropriate.

(j) Any alcoholic beverage which is the subject of a judgment of forfeiture pursuant to Section 11488.5 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 186.7 of the Penal Code, or a declaration of forfeiture pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 11488.4 of the Health and Safety Code may be sold, transferred, and delivered by the state or local governmental entity, as specified in Section 11489 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 186.8 of the Penal Code, to a
 person licensed to sell that type of alcoholic beverage pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1195, Sec. 1.2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 15. Tied-House Restrictions [25500. - 25512.]

25500.

(a) No manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, rectifier, California winegrower’s agent, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler, or any officer, director, or agent of any such person shall:

(1) Hold the ownership, directly or indirectly, of any interest in any on-sale license.

(2) Furnish, give, or lend any money or other thing of value, directly or indirectly, to, or guarantee the repayment of any loan or the fulfillment of any financial obligation of, any person engaged in operating, owning, or maintaining any on-sale premises where alcoholic beverages are sold for
 consumption on the premises.

(3) Own any interest, directly or indirectly, in the business, furniture, fixtures, refrigeration equipment, signs, except signs for interior use mentioned in subdivision (g) of Section 25503, or lease in or of any premises operated or maintained under any on-sale license for the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises where sold; or own any interest, directly or indirectly, in realty acquired after June 13, 1935, upon which on-sale premises are maintained unless the holding of the interest is permitted in accordance with rules of the department.

(b) This section does not apply to the holding by one person of a wholesaler’s license and an on-sale license in counties not to exceed 15,000 population.

(c) This section does not apply to the financial or representative relationship between a manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, rectifier, California winegrower’s agent, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler, or any officer, director, or agent of such person, and a person holding only one of the following types of licenses:

(1) On-sale general license for a bona fide club.

(2) Club license issued under Article 4 (commencing with Section 23425) of Chapter 3.

(3) Veterans’ club license issued under Article 5 (commencing with Section 23450) of Chapter 3.

(4) On-sale license for boats,
 trains, sleeping cars, or airplanes where the alcoholic beverages produced or sold by the manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, rectifier, California winegrower’s agent, bottler, importer, or wholesaler or any officer, director, or agent of the person are not sold, furnished, or given, directly or indirectly to the on-sale licensee.

(d) This section does not apply to an employee of a licensee referred to in subdivision (a) who is a nonadministrative and nonsupervisorial employee.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division or regulation of the department, this section does not apply to an employee of a licensee referred to in subdivision (a) who is the spouse of an on-sale licensee, so long as the on-sale licensee does not purchase, offer for sale, or
 promote, regardless of source, any of the brands of alcoholic beverages that are produced, bottled, processed, imported, rectified, distributed, represented, or sold by any licensee referred to in subdivision (a) that employs the spouse of the on-sale licensee.

(f) (1) Nothing in this division prohibits the holder of any retail on-sale or off-sale license from purchasing advertising in any publication published by
 a nonretail licensee.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) “Nonretail licensee” means any manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, rectifier, California winegrower’s agent, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler, or any person who does not directly or indirectly hold the ownership of any interest in a retail license.

(B) “Publication published by a nonretail licensee” includes Internet Web sites and social media feeds operated and maintained by or for a nonretail licensee under an account or Internet Web site address owned by the nonretail licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   (AB 776)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25500.1.

(a) The listing of the names, addresses, telephone numbers, email addresses, or Internet Web site addresses, or other electronic media, of two or more unaffiliated on-sale or off-sale retailers selling beer, wine, or distilled spirits produced, distributed, or imported by a nonretail industry member does not constitute a thing of value or prohibited inducement to the listed on-sale or off-sale retailer, provided all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The listing does not also contain the retail price of the product.

(2) The listing is the only reference to the on-sale or off-sale retailers in the direct communication.

(3) The listing does not refer only to one on-sale or off-sale retailer or only to on-sale or off-sale retail establishments controlled directly or indirectly by the same retailer.

(4) The listing is made, or produced, or paid for, exclusively by the nonretail industry member.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “nonretail industry member” is defined as a manufacturer, including, but not limited to, a beer manufacturer, winegrower, brandy manufacturer, rectifier, or distiller of alcoholic beverages or an agent of that entity, or a wholesaler, regardless of any other licenses held directly or indirectly by that person.
